Nebraska, session 109, LB122.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB122 LB122
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) On and after the effective date of this act, each
school board shall prominently display the national motto of the United
States, "In God We Trust", and the state motto of Nebraska, "Equality
Under the Law", written legibly in English on a poster or plaque no less
than eight and one-half by eleven inches in size, in each classroom or in
another prominent place in each school building where each student is
able to see and read it each day school is in session.
(2) A school board may accept contributions to defray the costs of
implementing this section.
-2-